Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 308A.050 to
308A.128.
SECTION 2. (1) This section applies to:
(a) Land within an exclusive farm use zone qualified for special assessment under  ORS
308A.062; and
(b) Nonexclusive farm use zone farmland  qualified for special assessment under ORS
308A.068.
(2) Land described in subsection (1) of this section shall be disqualified from the special
assessment upon either of the following outcomes against the owner of the land,  or the
person with legal possession and control of the land, based on conduct constituting illegal
growing of marijuana on that land:
(a) An order  imposing a civil penalty becoming final by operation of law or on appeal in
accordance with ORS 183.745.
(b) Entry of a final judgment of conviction.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this  section, land shall not be disqualified from
special assessment under this section if the landowner, or other person obligated to  pay ad
valorem property taxes on the land:
(a) Reasonably lacked knowledge of the illegal growing of marijuana on the land;
(b) Notified a law enforcement agency as soon  as practicable after the date on which the
landowner or other person knew or should have known that illegal growing of  marijuana was
occurring on the land; or
(c) Acquired the land in an arm’s-length transaction in the period between the  date on
which a civil penalty was imposed or a criminal complaint upon which  the final judgment of
conviction is based was filed and the date on which an order  or a final judgment described
in subsection (2) of this section was issued or entered.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of  ORS 308.210, 308A.056, 308A.062, 308A.068,
308A.071, 308A.113,  308A.116, 308A.718, 308A.724, 311.405 or 311.410 to the contrary, disquali-
fication under subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed to have occurred as of the Jan-
uary 1 assessment date of the earlier  of the assessment year in which a civil penalty was
Enrolled Senate Bill 347 (SB 347-A) Page 1
imposed or a criminal complaint  upon which the final judgment of conviction is based was
filed.
(b) The disqualification shall apply  to the portion of the land that is granted special as-
sessment under a program referred to in subsection (1) of this section  only for the year in
which the disqualification is deemed to have occurred under  paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The county assessor shall correct the tax roll for the year in  which the disqualifica-
tion is deemed to have occurred.
(5) Upon disqualification, additional taxes  shall be determined as provided in ORS
308A.700 to 308A.733.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Final judgment of conviction” means  a criminal judgment for which the time to ap-
peal has expired without any party filing  an appeal or that is not subject to further appeal
or review.
(b) “Illegal growing of marijuana” means the production of marijuana  in a manner or
place that subjects the production  or producer to civil or criminal enforcement under ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 308A.703 is amended to read:
308A.703. (1) This section applies to land upon the  land’s disqualification from special assess-
ment under any of the following sections:
(a) Exclusive farm use zone farmland under ORS 308A.113 or section 2 of this 2025 Act ;
(b) Nonexclusive farm use zone farmland under ORS 308A.116  or section 2 of this 2025 Act ;
(c) Western Oregon designated forestland under ORS 321.359;
(d) Eastern Oregon designated forestland under ORS 321.842;
(e) Wildlife habitat special assessment under ORS 308A.430; or
(f) Conservation easement special assessment under ORS 308A.465.
(2) Following a disqualification listed in subsection  (1) of this section, an additional tax shall
be added to the tax extended against the land on the next assessment  and tax roll, to be collected
and distributed in the same manner as other ad valorem property tax moneys. The  additional tax
shall be equal to the difference between the taxes assessed against the land and the taxes that
would otherwise have been assessed against the  land, for each of the number of years determined
under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The number of years  for which additional taxes shall be calculated shall equal the lesser of
the number of consecutive years the  land had qualified for the special assessment program for which
disqualification has occurred or:
(a) Ten years, in the  case of exclusive farm use zone farmland, but only if the land, immediately
following disqualification, remains outside an urban growth boundary;
(b) Ten years, in the case of wildlife  habitat special assessment land within an exclusive farm
use zone, but only  if the land, immediately following disqualification, remains outside an urban
growth boundary;
(c) Ten years, in the case of conservation  easement special assessment land within an exclusive
farm use zone, but  only if the land, immediately following disqualification, remains outside an urban
growth boundary; [ or]
(d) Five years, in the case of:
(A) Nonexclusive farm use zone farmland;
(B) Western Oregon designated forestland;
(C) Eastern Oregon designated forestland;
(D) Exclusive farm use zone farmland that is not described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(E) Wildlife habitat special assessment  land that is not described in paragraph (b) of this sub-
section; or
(F) Conservation easement special  assessment land that is not described in paragraph (c) of this
subsection[ .]; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 347 (SB 347-A) Page 2
(e) Notwithstanding paragraphs  (a) and (d) of this subsection, 10 years in the case of
exclusive farm use  zone farmland and nonexclusive farm use zone farmland disqualified un-
der section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(4)(a) Except as  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if disqualification under subsection
(1)(a) or (b) of this section occurs within five years  after the end of a period of farm use special
assessment pursuant to a remediation plan as defined  in ORS 308A.053, the number of years for
which the additional tax  shall be calculated shall be the number of years determined under sub-
section (3) of this section plus the number of years during which  farm use special assessment was
granted pursuant to the remediation plan.
(b) Additional tax may not be collected for the number of years during which  farm use special
assessment was granted pursuant to the remediation plan if the plan:
(A) Is implemented in good faith; and
(B) Fails to render continued farm use practicable.
(5) The additional taxes described in this section shall be deemed assessed and imposed  in the
year to which the additional taxes relate.
(6) If  the disqualification of the land is the result of the sale or transfer of the land to an own-
ership making the land exempt from ad valorem property taxation, the  lien for additional taxes shall
attach as of the day preceding the sale or transfer.
(7) The amount determined to be  due under this section may be paid to the tax collector prior
to the time of the next general property tax roll, pursuant to the provisions of ORS 311.370.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 308A.706 is amended to read:
308A.706. (1) Notwithstanding that land is  disqualified from special assessment, the additional
taxes described under ORS 308A.703 may not be imposed and shall remain a potential tax liability
if, as of the date the disqualification is taken into account on the assessment and tax roll, the land
is any of the following:
(a) Disqualified exclusive farm use zone farmland or nonexclusive farm use zone farmland that:
(A) Is not being used as farmland; and
(B) Is not being used for industrial, commercial, residential or other  use that is incompatible
with a purpose to return the land to farm use.
(b) Acquired by a governmental agency or body as a result of an exchange of the land for  land
of approximately equal value held by the governmental agency or body.
(c) Acquired and used for natural  heritage purposes and all of the following additional require-
ments are met:
(A) The land is registered under ORS 273.581 as a state natural area;
(B) The land is acquired by a private nonprofit corporation;
(C) The land  is retained by the corporation, or transferred to the state by the corporation, for
the purpose of educational, scientific and passive recreational use consistent with conservation  of
the ecological values and natural heritage resources of the area;
(D) If the land is retained by the corporation, it remains open  to the public without charge for
the uses described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph; and
(E) The land is managed pursuant to a voluntary management agreement under ORS 273.581 (5).
(d) Qualified for special assessment under:
(A) ORS 308A.062, relating to farm use special assessment of  land in an exclusive farm use zone;
(B) ORS 308A.068, relating to farm use special  assessment of nonexclusive farm use zone
farmland;
(C) ORS 321.358, relating to classification as designated forestland in western Oregon;
(D) ORS 321.839, relating to classification as designated forestland in eastern Oregon;
(E) ORS 321.709, relating to qualification as small tract forestland;
(F) ORS 308A.424, relating to wildlife habitat special assessment; or
(G) ORS 308A.456, relating to conservation easement special assessment.
(e) Disqualified nonexclusive farm use zone farmland, to the extent  the additional taxes are de-
ferred or abated as provided in ORS 308A.119.
Enrolled Senate Bill 347 (SB 347-A) Page 3
(2) This section does not apply to the additional taxes imposed under :
(a) ORS 308A.703 (4)(a) for the number of years  during which farm use special assessment was
granted pursuant to a remediation plan as defined in ORS 308A.053.
(b) Section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(3) In any case where the additional tax is deferred under the provisions of this section  but may
subsequently be imposed  under ORS 308A.712, the county assessor shall continue to enter the no-
tation “potential additional tax liability” on the assessment and tax roll.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 475C.421 is amended to read:
475C.421. (1) The county courts,  district attorneys and municipal authorities, immediately upon
the conviction of  a licensee of a violation of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, or of a violation of any other
law of this state or ordinance of a city or county located in this state an  element of which is the
possession, delivery or manufacture  of a marijuana item, shall notify the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission of the conviction.
(2) Immediately upon a judicial outcome  subject to notice in the case of a licensee, or a
person required to be  licensed under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, for a violation subject to no-
tice, the county courts, district  attorneys and municipal authorities shall notify the com-
mission, each county assessor having jurisdiction over the farmland  on which the prohibited
conduct occurred and the Department of Revenue of  the judicial outcome subject to notice
and the location of the farmland.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Final judgment of conviction” has the meaning given that term in section 2  of this
2025 Act.
(b) “Illegal growing of marijuana” has the meaning given that  term in section 2 of this
2025 Act.
(c) “Judicial outcome subject to notice” means the issuance of  an order imposing a civil
penalty, or the entry of a final judgment of conviction, as  described in section 2 (2) of this
2025 Act.
(d) “Violation subject to notice” means a violation of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525,  or a vio-
lation of any other law of this state or ordinance of a city or county located in this  state,
an element of which is the illegal growing of marijuana on farmland.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 308A.083 is amended to read:
308A.083. In the  case of exclusive farm use zone farmland that qualifies for special assessment
under ORS 308A.062  or nonexclusive farm use zone farmland that qualifies for special assessment
under ORS 308A.068, the county assessor shall enter on the assessment  and tax roll the notation
“potential additional tax liability” until the land is disqualified under ORS 308A.113 or  308A.116 or
section 2 of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 7. Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 308A.083,  308A.703,
308A.706 and 475C.421 by sections 3 to 6 of this 2025 Act apply  to conduct constituting illegal
growing of marijuana that occurs on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 347 (SB 347-A) Page 4
Passed by Senate June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 347 (SB 347-A) Page 5